Indiana, session 2026, SB145.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 10-11-13 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 13. Downtown District Law Enforcement
Sec. 1. The general assembly finds the following:
(1) The downtown district of Indianapolis, Marion County,
occupies a unique position as:
(A) the seat of government for the State of Indiana and
Marion County; and
(B) a center for major sporting events and tourism that
drives economic development in Indianapolis and Indiana.
(2) The downtown district faces unique and distinct challenges
relating to public safety that negatively impact tourism and
economic development and are harmful to the health,
prosperity, economic stability, and general welfare of this
area.
(3) It is necessary and appropriate for the State of Indiana to
2026 IN 145—LS 6373/DI 87


take action to address the challenges set forth in subdivision
(2) to serve the interests of Indianapolis and Indiana.
Sec. 2. The general assembly finds that the powers and
responsibilities under this chapter are appropriate and necessary
to carry out the public purposes of protecting the public health,
safety, and welfare and fostering economic development within the
downtown district.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "consolidated city" means the
city of Indianapolis, Marion County.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "district" means the downtown
district established in section 6 of this chapter.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "executive" means the mayor of
the consolidated city.
Sec. 6. (a) On January 1, 2027, the downtown district is
established within the consolidated city.
(b) The district consists of the following:
(1) The area bounded on the:
(A) west by West Street;
(B) north by North Street;
(C) east by East Street; and
(D) south by South Street;
in the city of Indianapolis, including the boundary streets and
rights-of-way as those streets were located on January 1,
2027.
(2) The areas on which are located:
(A) Victory Field;
(B) Lucas Oil Stadium;
(C) Military Park;
(D) American Legion Mall; and
(E) the U.S.S. Indianapolis National Memorial;
in the city of Indianapolis, including the facilities or complex
of facilities, parking lots, and any adjacent streets and the
rights-of-way, as those streets were located on January 1,
2027.
Any state real property that fronts on or abuts the boundary, as of
January 1, 2027, is considered to be within the district.
(c) The district does not include the areas on which the following
are located:
(1) The Eiteljorg Museum.
(2) The Indiana State Museum.
Sec. 7. After December 31, 2026, the governor has the duty and
responsibility to provide adequate law enforcement services within
2026 IN 145—LS 6373/DI 87


the district.
Sec. 8. The governor and the executive shall each take steps to
negotiate and execute an agreement for mutual assistance between
the state and the consolidated city regarding law enforcement
services provided by the state police department and the
Indianapolis metropolitan police department within the district.
Sec. 9. If a mutual aid agreement is not executed before January
1, 2027, the state police department shall provide all law
enforcement services within the district after December 31, 2026,
until and unless a mutual aid agreement is entered into by the state
and consolidated city at a future date.
Sec. 10. This chapter contains full and complete authority for
the governor, subject to the availability of funding, to take all
actions necessary to carry out the purposes and provisions of this
chapter, including establishing the qualifications for and employing
necessary state police officers.
Sec. 11. (a) As used in this section, "state's costs" means the
costs to the state to provide:
(1) law enforcement services within the district; and
(2) any necessary office and staff of the special prosecutor
under IC 33-39-10.5-4.
(b) The treasurer of state shall deduct the state's costs from:
(1) revenue held by the state that would otherwise be available
for distribution to the consolidated city under any other law;
and
(2) the amount distributed to the consolidated city.
(c) A reduction under subsection (b) must be made as follows:
(1) First, from local income tax distributions under IC 6-3.6-9
that would otherwise be distributed to the consolidated city.
(2) Second, from any other revenues that:
(A) are held by the state; and
(B) would otherwise be available for distribution to the
consolidated city under any other law.
Sec. 12. This chapter shall be liberally construed to effect the
purposes of this chapter.
SECTION 2. IC 33-39-10-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.147-2025,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) A person may be appointed as a special
prosecutor:
(1) as provided under this section; or
(2) in accordance with IC 4-2-7-7; or
(3) as provided by IC 33-39-10.5.
2026 IN 145—LS 6373/DI 87


(b) A circuit court or superior court judge:
(1) shall appoint a special prosecutor if:
(A) any person, other than a prosecuting attorney or the
prosecuting attorney's deputy, files a verified petition
requesting the appointment of a special prosecutor; and
(B) the prosecuting attorney agrees that a special prosecutor is
needed;
(2) may appoint a special prosecutor if:
(A) a person files a verified petition requesting the
appointment of a special prosecutor; and
(B) the court, after:
(i) notice is given to the prosecuting attorney; and
(ii) an evidentiary hearing is conducted at which the
prosecuting attorney is given an opportunity to be heard;
finds by clear and convincing evidence that the appointment
is necessary to avoid an actual conflict of interest or there is
probable cause to believe that the prosecuting attorney has
committed a crime;
(3) may appoint a special prosecutor if:
(A) the prosecuting attorney files a petition requesting the
court to appoint a special prosecutor; and
(B) the court finds that the appointment is necessary to avoid
the appearance of impropriety;
(4) may appoint a special prosecutor if:
(A) an elected public official who is a defendant in a criminal
proceeding files a verified petition requesting a special
prosecutor within ten (10) days after the date of the initial
hearing; and
(B) the court finds that the appointment of a special prosecutor
is in the best interests of justice; and
(5) shall appoint a special prosecutor if:
(A) a previously appointed special prosecutor:
(i) files a motion to withdraw as special prosecutor; or
(ii) has become incapable of continuing to represent the
interests of the state; and
(B) the court finds that the facts that established the basis for
the initial appointment of a special prosecutor still exist.
The elected prosecuting attorney who serves in the jurisdiction of
the appointing court shall receive notice of all pleadings filed and
orders issued under this subdivision.
(c) A person appointed to serve as a special prosecutor:
(1) must consent to the appointment; and
2026 IN 145—LS 6373/DI 87


(2) must be:
(A) the prosecuting attorney or a deputy prosecuting attorney
in a judicial circuit other than the judicial circuit in which the
person is to serve as special prosecutor; or
(B) a senior prosecuting attorney as described in section 1 of
this chapter. A senior prosecuting attorney may be appointed
to serve as a special prosecutor in a judicial circuit in which
the senior prosecuting attorney previously served if the court
finds that the appointment would not create the appearance of
impropriety.
(d) A person appointed to serve as a special prosecutor in a judicial
circuit has the same powers as the prosecuting attorney of the judicial
circuit. However, the appointing judge shall limit the scope of the
special prosecutor's duties to include only the investigation or
prosecution of a particular case or particular grand jury investigation.
(e) Upon making an appointment under this section, the court shall
establish the length of the special prosecutor's term. At least one (1)
time every six (6) months throughout the appointed term, a special
prosecutor shall file a progress report with the appointing court. A
progress report:
(1) must inform the court of the:
(A) status of the investigation; and
(B) estimated time for completion of the special prosecutor's
duties; and
(2) may not:
(A) include substantive facts or legal issues; or
(B) offer preliminary conclusions.
The court may extend the term of appointment upon the request of the
special prosecutor or terminate any appointment if the special
prosecutor has failed to file reports or a request for an extended term
under this subsection.
(f) If the target of an investigation by the special prosecutor is a
public servant (as defined in IC 35-31.5-2-261), the court shall order
the special prosecutor to file a report of the investigation with the court
at the conclusion of the investigation. A report filed under this
subsection is a public record under IC 5-14-3.
(g) If a special prosecutor is not regularly employed as a full-time
prosecuting attorney or full-time deputy prosecuting attorney, the
compensation for the special prosecutor's services:
(1) shall be paid, as incurred, to the special prosecutor following
an application to the county auditor, from the unappropriated
funds of the appointing county; and
2026 IN 145—LS 6373/DI 87


(2) may not exceed:
(A) an hourly rate based upon the regular salary of a full-time
prosecuting attorney of the appointing circuit;
(B) travel expenses and reasonable accommodation expenses
actually incurred; and
(C) other reasonable expenses actually incurred, including the
costs of investigation, trial and discovery preparation, and
other trial expenses.
The amount of compensation a special prosecutor receives for services
performed during a calendar day under subdivision (2)(A) may not
exceed the amount of compensation a full-time prosecuting attorney
would receive in salary for the calendar day.
(h) If the special prosecutor is regularly employed as a full-time
prosecuting attorney or deputy prosecuting attorney, the compensation
for the special prosecutor's services:
(1) shall be paid out of the appointing county's unappropriated
funds to the treasurer of the county in which the special
prosecutor regularly serves; and
(2) must include a per diem equal to the regular salary of a
full-time prosecuting attorney of the appointing circuit, travel
expenses, and reasonable accommodation expenses actually
incurred.
SECTION 3. IC 33-39-10.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 10.5. Downtown District Special Prosecutor
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "district" means the downtown
district established by IC 10-11-13-6.
Sec. 2. (a) The governor shall appoint a person to serve as the
special prosecutor for the district. A person may be appointed as
the special prosecutor for the district if the person was employed
for at least eight (8) years as a:
(1) prosecuting attorney;
(2) chief deputy prosecuting attorney; or
(3) deputy prosecuting attorney appointed under
IC 33-39-6-2.
(b) A person may not be appointed as the special prosecutor
under this section if a disciplinary sanction has been imposed on
the person by:
(1) the Indiana supreme court disciplinary commission; or
(2) a similar body in another state;
that restricts the person's ability to practice law.
2026 IN 145—LS 6373/DI 87


Sec. 3. (a) The governor shall appoint the special prosecutor for
a four (4) year term beginning January 1, 2027, and ending
December 31, 2031. The special prosecutor may be reappointed for
one (1) or more additional four (4) year terms. If a special
prosecutor is appointed to fill a vacancy, the special prosecutor
serves during the unexpired term of the special prosecutor's
predecessor and may be reappointed for one (1) or more additional
four (4) year terms.
(b) The special prosecutor may be removed by the court only for
cause, including misfeasance, malfeasance, and nonfeasance.
Sec. 4. The governor shall:
(1) make available adequate office space and equipment for
prosecutorial activities; and
(2) subject to the availability of funding, authorize the special
prosecutor to employ staff, including one (1) or more deputy
prosecuting attorneys, necessary to carry out the special
prosecutor's responsibilities. A person employed as a special
deputy prosecuting attorney must be an attorney licensed to
practice law in Indiana.
Sec. 5. For a crime committed within the district, the special
prosecutor has concurrent jurisdiction with the prosecuting
attorney of the judicial district. However:
(1) the special prosecutor has primary jurisdiction; and
(2) the prosecuting attorney of the judicial district has
secondary jurisdiction;
for prosecuting a crime committed in the district.
Sec. 6. (a) The special prosecutor has the same powers as the
prosecuting attorney of the judicial circuit.
(b) The special prosecutor has the power to conduct an
investigation outside the district with respect to a crime committed
inside the district.
2026 IN 145—LS 6373/DI 87